test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_V_IMP_niimi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  VAI - V - niimi - IMP :

  #Template Key
  #1
  #imperative

     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     niimi+VAI+Imp+Del+2: niimikan
     niimi+VAI+Imp+Del+2+Pl: niimikag
     niimi+VAI+Imp+Imm+2: niimin
     niimi+VAI+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl: niimidaa
     niimi+VAI+Imp+Imm+2+Pl: niimig
     niimi+VAI+Imp+Proh+2: niimiken
     niimi+VAI+Imp+Proh+2+1+Pl: niimisiidaa
     niimi+VAI+Imp+Proh+2+Pl: niimikegon
     
